Washington statutes.
RCW 15.150.030

Cannabis testing laboratory quality standards—Rule making.

(1) The department must establish and maintain cannabis testing laboratory quality standards by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Cannabis testing laboratory quality standards must include, but are not limited to, approved methods for testing cannabis for compliance with product standards established by rule by the state liquor and cannabis board or the department of health, method validation protocol, and performance measures and criteria applied to testing of cannabis products.

(3) The department must take into account the recommendations of the team created in RCW 15.150.020.

(4) Standards created under this chapter must be provided to the state department of ecology for use in the lab accreditation process described in RCW 69.50.348.

[ 2022 c 135 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2022 c 135: See note following RCW 15.150.010.